Maine, session 132, LD996.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA c. 201, sub-c. 15 is enacted to read:
SUBCHAPTER 15
WEATHERIZATION PLUS PROGRAM
§4994-C. Weatherization Plus Program
1. Program established. The Weatherization Plus Program, referred to in this
subchapter as "the program," is established within the Maine State Housing Authority, for
the purposes described in subsection 2. The program must be operated in conjunction with
other programs of the authority.
2. Purposes of program. The purposes of the program are to:
A. Help eligible low-income households implement energy conservation measures
through grants and the funding of weatherization readiness or weatherization projects.
For the purposes of this subchapter, "weatherization readiness" means the process to
protect a building from the outside weather elements and improve its energy efficiency;
B. Reduce the number of deferrals from the Weatherization Assistance for Low-income
Persons Program administered through the United States Department of Energy and
referenced in section 4741, subsection 15; and
C. Maximize the use of federal funding available for the purposes in paragraphs A and
B.
3. Program requirements. The Maine State Housing Authority shall establish
program requirements, including, but not limited to, requiring that an applicant for the
program:
A. Meet the same household income eligibility requirements applicable to the
Weatherization Assistance for Low-income Persons Program administered through the
United States Department of Energy and implemented pursuant to section 4741,
subsection 15;
B. Demonstrate the dwelling for which the funds are to be applied is a single-family
house or manufactured housing occupied by the applicant or another eligible
low-income household; and
C. For weatherization readiness projects, provide a substantiated expectation of the
dwelling being weatherized following completion of the weatherization readiness
project.
An approved applicant may be awarded a grant of up to $20,000.
§4994-D. Weatherization Plus Fund
The Weatherization Plus Fund, referred to in this subchapter as "the fund," is
established under the jurisdiction and control of the Maine State Housing Authority for the
purpose of providing funds for the program.
1. Sources of fund. Sources of the fund include:
Page 1 - 132LR1547(01)

A. All money appropriated for inclusion in the fund;
B. Subject to any pledge, contract or other obligation, any money that the Maine State
Housing Authority receives in repayment of advances from the fund;
C. Subject to any pledge, contract or other obligation, all interest, dividends and
pecuniary gains from investment of money of the fund; and
D. Any other money available to and directed by the Maine State Housing Authority
to be paid into the fund.
2. Revolving fund. The fund is a nonlapsing, revolving fund. The Maine State
Housing Authority shall continuously apply all money in the fund to carry out the purposes
of this subchapter.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
Weatherization Plus Fund N505
Initiative: Provides one-time funds for grants to eligible low-income households for
weatherization readiness and weatherization projects pursuant to the Maine Revised
Statutes, Title 30-A, chapter 201, subchapter 15.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,000,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,000,000 $0